Massachusetts, session 194th, H2964.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 94B of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “unit”, in line 8, the following words:- , explosive
device canine handlers and bomb technicians
of 1